src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
# Verb inflection
## Irregular verbs

* **LEXICON V-ei ** lists the negative verb, including imperative forms.

* **LEXICON K_V-neg ** gives the focus particle for +Neg, and directs to K_V.

* **LEXICON V-olla ** gives the forms of olla, and redirects to K_V

oon

## Regular verbs

* **LEXICON V-jäävvä ** so far only splits to the next lexicon

* **LEXICON V-jäävvä_01 **. 
TODO: Document difference between this and previous

* **LEXICON V-käyvvä **  käyvvä:kä
TODO: Dokument difference between this and previous

* **LEXICON V-tuuvva ** 
* tuuvva:too

* **LEXICON V-voija  ** voija:voi

* **LEXICON V-antaa ** redirects to next only antaa:ant

* **LEXICON V-antaa_01 ** 

* **LEXICON V-lukkia ** 
* lukkia:luk

* **LEXICON V-tiitää **
* tiitää:tiit

* **LEXICON V-tiitää_01 **
tiije

tiitämätöin
tiitää

* **LEXICON V-näyttää ** näyttää:näytt

* **LEXICON V-näyttää_01 **
näytetää

näyttännöö

näyttävä
näyttänt
näyttämätöin
näyttää
näyttämää

* **LEXICON V-laatia ** !! laatia:laati

## 3-syllable
kiirehtiä:kiireh

* **LEXICON V-hyväksyä **

* **LEXICON V-kutsua **

* **LEXICON V-kutsua_01 **

* **LEXICON V-kirjuttaa **

* **LEXICON V-kirjuttaa_01 **

* **LEXICON V-tulla **

* **LEXICON V-tulla_01 **

* **LEXICON V-ommella **

* **LEXICON V-ommella_01 **

* **LEXICON V-nähä **

* **LEXICON V-nähä_01 **

* **LEXICON V-panna **

* **LEXICON V-panna_01 **

* **LEXICON V-sannoa **

* **LEXICON V-painuttaissa **

* **LEXICON V-pittiissä **

* **LEXICON V-pittiissä_01 **

* **LEXICON V-vuhissa_01 **

* **LEXICON V-laatihussa **

* **LEXICON V-määrätä ** goes to V-arvata

* **LEXICON V-upota ** goes to V-arvata

* **LEXICON V-arvata **

* **LEXICON V-hävitä **

* **LEXICON V-merkitä **

* **LEXICON V-merkitä_01 **

* **LEXICON V-ahavojja **

## DERIVATION 

* Actor in jA
* **LEXICON V-actor_jA **

## PARTICIPLES

* **LEXICON V-ActPrsPrc **
* **LEXICON V-ActPrtPrc_nt **

* **LEXICON V-ActPrtPrc_rt **

## CONJUGATION

### INDICATIVE PRETERITE

* **LEXICON IndPrt ** split 1-2 vs 3

* **LEXICON IndPrt_1-2 **

* **LEXICON IndPrt_3 **

* **LEXICON IND-PRT-SG1 **

* **LEXICON IND-PRT-SG2 **

* **LEXICON IND-PRT-SG3 **

* **LEXICON IND-PRT-PL1 **

* **LEXICON IND-PRT-PL2 **

* **LEXICON IND-PRT-PL3 **
This is not working 2012-10-30

## CONDITIONAL 

* **LEXICON CondPers **

## POTENTIAL

:n, :s, :l, :r, :n
* **LEXICON PotPers **

* **LEXICON ImprtPers_k **

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-izh/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>

---
